Hawaii, session 2025, GM1187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 89-11, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (e) to read as follows:
"(e) If an impasse exists, between a public employer and
the exclusive representative of bargaining unit (2), supervisory
employees in blue collar positions; bargaining unit (3) ,
nonsupervisory employees in white collar positions; bargaining
unit (4) , supervisory employees in white collar positions;
bargaining unit (6), educational officers and other personnel of
the department of education under the same salary schedule;
bargaining unit (8), personnel of the [University] university of
Hawaii and the community college system, other than faculty;
bargaining unit (9), registered professional nurses; bargaining
unit (10), institutional, health, and correctional workers;
bargaining unit (11), firefighters; bargaining unit (12), police
officers; bargaining unit (13), professional and scientific
employees; bargaining unit (14), state law enforcement officers;
or bargaining unit (15), state and county ocean safety and water
2025-3327 HB162 CDl HMSO
mgiiiiiiniiiiiiD

Page 2 162
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D, 1
safety officers, the board shall assist in the resolution of the
impasse as follows:
(1) Mediation. During the first twenty days after the
date of impasse, the board shall immediately appoint a
mediator, representative of the public from a list of
qualified persons maintained by the board, to assist
the parties in a voluntary resolution of the
impasse[—]; and
(2) Arbitration. If the impasse continues twenty days
after the date of impasse, the board shall immediately
notify the employer and the exclusive representative
that the impasse shall be submitted to a three-member
arbitration panel who shall follow the arbitration
procedure provided [he^^ein-:-] in this paragraph:
(A) Arbitration panel. Two members of the
arbitration panel shall be selected by the
parties; one shall be selected by the employer
and one shall be selected by the exclusive
representative. The neutral third member of the
arbitration panel, who shall chair the
arbitration panel, shall be selected by mutual
2025-3327 HB162 CDl HMSO
lilllljlllllllilMllill

Page 3
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
agreement of the parties. In the event that the
parties fail to select the neutral third member
of the arbitration panel within thirty days from
the date of impasse, the board shall request the
American Arbitration Association [7-] or Federal
Mediation and Conciliation Service, or [its
ouGGCGGor] their respective successors in
function, to furnish a list of five qualified and
experienced interest arbitrators from which the
neutral arbitrator shall be selected[—]; provided
that the list of five interest arbitrators may
contain interest arbitrators from both the
American Arbitration Association and Federal
Mediation and Conciliation Service, or their
respective successors. Within five days after
receipt of the list, the parties shall
alternately strike names from the list until a
single name is left, who shall be immediately
appointed by the board as the neutral arbitrator
and chairperson of the arbitration panel[—]£
2025-3327 HB162 CDl HMSO
iiiiiuimiiininiHiHin

Page 4 H.B. NO 162
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
(B) Final positions. Upon the selection and
appointment of the arbitration panel, each party
shall submit to the panel, in writing, with copy
to the other party, a final position that shall
include all provisions in any existing collective
bargaining agreement not being modified, all
provisions already agreed to in negotiations, and
all further provisions that each party is
proposing for inclusion in the final agreement;
provided that [such] further provisions shall be
limited to those specific proposals that were
submitted in writing to the other party and were
the subject of collective bargaining between the
parties up to the time of the impasse, including
those specific proposals that the parties have
decided to include through a written mutual
agreement. The arbitration panel shall decide
whether final positions are compliant with this
provision and which proposals may be considered
for inclusion in the final agreement[—]£
2025-3327 HB162 CDl HMSO
iiiginiiiiHiiiiiiiHi

Page 5
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(C) Arbitration hearing. Within one hundred twenty
days of its appointment, the arbitration panel
shall commence a hearing at which time the
parties may submit, either in writing or through
oral testimony, all information or data
supporting their respective final positions. The
arbitrator, or the chairperson of the arbitration
panel together with the other two members, [a^?e]
shall be encouraged to assist the parties in a
voluntary resolution of the impasse through
mediation, to the extent practicable throughout
the entire arbitration period until the date the
panel is required to issue its arbitration
decision [t-] ; and
(D) Arbitration decision. Within thirty days after
the conclusion of the hearing, a majority of the
arbitration panel shall reach a decision pursuant
to subsection (f) on all provisions that each
party proposed in its respective final position
for inclusion in the final agreement and transmit
a preliminary draft of its decision to the
2025-3327 HB162 GDI HMSO
ininniiiiiiiniiiB

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
parties. The parties shall review the
preliminary draft for completeness, technical
correctness, and clarity and may mutually submit
to the panel any desired changes or adjustments
that shall be incorporated in the final draft of
its decision. Within fifteen days after the
transmittal of the preliminary draft, a majority
of the arbitration panel shall issue the
arbitration decision."
SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3327 HB162 CDl HMSO 6
MHIIIiHHIIIIIHI

162
H.B. NO
H.D. 2
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 27th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 162, HD 2, SD1,CD1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 162, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30,2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate